Hawaii statutes.
§322-30 Cost of improvement; how
apportioned. The cost of the improvements made or completed by the
comptroller shall be apportioned as follows:

(1) Cost of filling any lot or parcel shall be borne
by the lot or parcel;

(2) Cost of any drainage system including the cost of
drains or ditches, damages for property taken for the same, and other expenses,
if any, shall be apportioned among all the lots or parcels in the drainage
district in proportion to their respective areas. [L 1915, c 190, §7; RL 1925,
§984; RL 1935, §1334; RL 1945, §2725; RL 1955, §47-29; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§12; HRS §322-30]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next